Utah statutes.
39-6-81.   Failure to obey order or regulation.

A person subject to this chapter shall be punished as a military court directs who:

(1)  violates or fails to obey any lawful general order or regulation;

(2)  knowingly of any other lawful order issued by a member of the National Guard, which it is his duty to obey, fails to obey the order; or

(3)  is derelict in the performance of his duties.



Enacted by Chapter 210, 1988 General Session

